Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB592.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 610 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A pilot program shall be established in no less than ten (10) public school
districts selected by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court to participate in a
Supporting Opportunities for Accountability and Restoration Program, also
known as the SOAR Program. The SOAR Program shall include at least one (1)
school from each participating school district and shall begin August 1, 2026,
and continue for four (4) years unless extended or limited by the General
Assembly.
(2) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall create and maintain a SOAR
Program in each selected school to:
(a) Identify and address barriers to school attendance among students in grades
six (6) through twelve (12); and
(b) Address barriers to successful completion of status offense diversions if a
referral has been made to the RISE team as provided in subsection (6)(b) or
(c) of this section.
(3) All students in grades (6) through twelve (12) of a school participating in the
SOAR Program who have been absent without excuse for more than five (5) days
during a school term, along with a parent, guardian, or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision, shall participate in the SOAR Program.
(4) (a) Each selected school shall establish a Responsive Interventions to Support
and Empower team, also known as the "RISE" team, whose members shall
include:
1. The director of pupil personnel;
2. A family resource and youth services center representative of the
Page 1 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
school;
3. The school's social worker or school counselor;
4. A school resource officer;
5. A local representative of the Department for Community Based
Services;
6. One (1) or more additional members, at least one (1) of whom shall be
a representative of the:
a. Community mental health center;
b. Regional interagency council specified in KRS 200.509(1)(a) to
(d) and (g);
c. Corresponding local interagency council if a council exists; or
d. An additional school-based mental health services provider as
defined in KRS 158.4416; and
7. The court-designated worker in the participating school district's
judicial district or circuit.
(b) The RISE team shall serve in place of the family accountability,
intervention, and response team establish by KRS 605.035 for that school
during the pilot project.
(5) The court-designated worker shall:
(a) Convene and facilitate the RISE team for each selected school district; and
(b) Provide case management support to the family of a participating student.
(6) Each RISE team shall adopt a case management approach and process for
reviewing:
(a) Families subject to a truancy intervention precomplaint;
(b) Referrals from the court-designated worker in cases in which a student has:
1. Failed to appear for a preliminary intake;
2. Declined to enter into a diversion agreement; or
Page 2 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
3. Failed to complete the terms of a diversion agreement; and
(c) Status offense cases if the court-designated worker, after review of the
complaint, has determined that no further action is necessary.
(7) The RISE team shall meet with the student and the student's parent, guardian, or
other person exercising custodial control or supervision to develop a family-
specific improvement plan to address the barriers to school attendance or, if
referred pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, address the barriers to
successful completion of a diversion agreement. The RISE team shall also
identify resources to address the identified barriers and issues and assist in
connecting the families to those resources.
(8) The RISE team shall be a part of Kentucky's juvenile justice system under
Section 8 of this Act and shall, subject to restrictions imposed by state or federal
law, disclose and share with other identified agencies all information they
maintain on a student in accordance with Section 8 of this Act.
(9) Each participating school district shall provide attendance information necessary
for the SOAR Program.
(10) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit an annual report to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on
Judiciary and the Interim Joint Committee on Education beginning July 1, 2027,
and by July 1 of each following year, that includes:
(a) The number of students referred to the SOAR Program;
(b) The services to which the family was referred;
(c) The number of students who completed the SOAR Program;
(d) The number of students who did not successfully complete the SOAR
Program that resulted in a habitual truancy complaint and the reasons for
the unsuccessful completion; and
(e) Recommendations for improvement of the SOAR Program.
Page 3 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 610 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon receipt of a completed truancy intervention precomplaint form required
under subsection (2) of Section 3 of this Act, the court-designated worker shall:
(a) Provide notice to the student and the student's parent, guardian, or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision that they shall attend an
initial meeting with the court-designated worker to discuss barriers to
school attendance or other identified issues;
(b) At the initial meeting, the court-designated worker shall:
1. Perform a family needs assessment to identify barriers to school
attendance or, if referred pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of Section 1 of
this Act, to address the barriers to successful completion of a diversion
agreement, and to identify services to address these barriers and any
other identified issues;
2. Provide the results of the family needs assessment to the student and
the student's parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision; and
3. Provide the student and the student's parent, guardian, or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision with notice to attend
a mandatory meeting with the RISE team, together with the date, time,
and either the physical location of the meeting if conducted in person,
or the meeting access information, if conducted virtually;
(c) Provide the RISE team with the results of the family needs assessment no
later than forty-eight (48) hours following the initial meeting;
(d) 1. Convene and facilitate the RISE team to review and enhance the
family-specific improvement plan to address barriers to school
attendance, or barriers to completion of a diversion agreement if
Page 4 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
referred pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of Section 1 of this Act for each
identified family; and
2. Before the conclusion of the RISE team meeting, provide each
identified family and each identified school with a written family-
specific improvement plan;
(e) If applicable, review a family-specific improvement plan or a diversion
agreement to incorporate modifications to a family-specific improvement
plan or diversion agreement; and
(f) Provide case management services to assist the family in achieving the goals
of the family-specific improvement plan.
(2) (a) Upon the accrual of fifteen (15) unexcused absences by a student who is
participating in the SOAR Program, the court-designated worker shall
notify the county attorney and shall provide the county attorney with a
report on the efforts and results of the SOAR Program's work with the
student and the parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision of the student.
(b) 1. The county attorney shall, upon review of the report, determine if
court intervention is appropriate against the student.
2. If the county attorney determines that court intervention is appropriate
against the student, he or she shall notify the director of pupil
personnel to immediately file a habitual truancy complaint.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 159 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In addition to the duties assigned under Section 4 of this Act, the director of pupil
personnel, or an assistant appointed under KRS 159.080 shall:
(1) Upon a student in grades six (6) through twelve (12) becoming a truant as
defined in KRS 159.150(1), provide written notice to the student and the student's
Page 5 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of
the following:
(a) The number of the student's unexcused absences;
(b) An explanation of the attendance policy, including policies for required
documentation for excused absences;
(c) Available resources and tools intended to prevent further unexcused
absences; and
(d) Contact information with office hours for the parent, guardian, or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision to contact the director of
pupil personnel, or an assistant appointed under KRS 159.080, to discuss
barriers to attendance and potential solutions to overcome those barriers;
(2) Upon a student in grades six (6) through twelve (12) being absent without excuse
five (5) days during a school year, provide notice to the court-designated worker
using a truancy intervention precomplaint form of the following:
(a) The number and dates of the student's unexcused absences;
(b) A copy of the written notice provided to the student and the student's parent,
guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or supervision
required in subsection (1) of this section;
(c) Contact information for the parent, guardian, or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision; and
(d) A description of the interventions and support services offered to the student
and the student's parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision; and
(3) Participate in the SOAR Program established in Section 1 of this Act if available
at the school.
Section 4. KRS 159.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The director of pupil personnel, or an assistant appointed under KRS 159.080, shall:
Page 6 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(a) Devote his or her entire time to the duties of the office except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Enforce the compulsory attendance and census laws in the attendance district
he or she serves;
(c) Acquaint the school with the home conditions of a habitual truant as
defined[described] in KRS 159.150(3), and the home with the work and
advantages of the school;
(d) Ascertain the causes of irregular attendance and truancy, through documented
contact with the custodian of the student, and seek the elimination of these
causes, which shall include performing the duties required in Section 3 of
this Act in those schools within the district that are participating in the
SOAR Program under Section 1 of this Act;
(e) Secure the enrollment in school of all students who should be enrolled and
keep all enrolled students in reasonably regular attendance;
(f) Attempt to visit the homes of students who are reported to be in need of
books, clothing, or parental care;
(g) Provide for the interviewing of students and the parents of those students who
quit school to determine the reasons for the decision. The interviews shall be
conducted in a location that is nonthreatening for the students and parents and
according to procedures and interview questions established by an
administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
by the Kentucky Board of Education. The questions shall be designed to
provide data that can be used for local district and statewide research and
decision-making. Data shall be reported annually to the local board of
education and the Department of Education;
(h) Report to the superintendent of schools in the district in which the student
resides the number and cost of books and school supplies needed by any
Page 7 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
student whose parent, guardian, or custodian does not have sufficient income
to furnish the student with the necessary books and school supplies; and
(i) Keep the records and make the reports that are required by law, by
administrative regulation of the Kentucky Board of Education, and by the
superintendent and board of education.
(2) A local school district superintendent may waive the requirement that a director of
pupil personnel devote his or her entire time to his or her duties. The superintendent
shall report the decision to the commissioner of education.
(3) In any action brought to enforce compulsory attendance laws, the director of pupil
personnel or an assistant shall document the home conditions of the student and the
intervention strategies attempted and:
(a) For a minor in kindergarten to grade five (5) whose parent or guardian is in
violation of the provisions of KRS 159.010(1)(a) by allowing the child to be
absent without excuse for fifteen (15) or more days during a school year, shall
report the matter to the county attorney for determination of appropriate court
intervention, if any; and
(b) For a minor in grade six (6) through twelve (12) who is a habitual truant as
defined in KRS 159.150(3)[600.020] and has been absent without excuse for
fifteen (15) or more days during a school year, shall report the matter to the
county attorney for a determination of appropriate court intervention and, if a
complaint is filed with the court-designated worker, proceed under KRS
610.030(6).
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Complaint" has the same meaning as in KRS 600.020;
(b) "Court-designated worker" has the same meaning as in KRS 600.020; and
Page 8 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(c) "Habitual truant" has the same meaning as in KRS 159.150(3).
(2) The purpose of this section is to require the collection and reporting of data that
will aid in the understanding of the impact that various interventions have on the
attendance of students who are habitually truant.
(3) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, each school district shall document the
following information in the state student information system:
(a) The filing of a complaint for habitual truancy by the school district with the
court-designated worker;
(b) The resolution of the habitual truancy complaint filed with the court-
designated worker, including the date of the resolution and whether the
complaint was:
1. Not pursued;
2. Successfully diverted;
3. Forwarded to the county attorney for court action; or
4. Resolved in some other manner;
(c) The reporting of a student to the county attorney as required by subsection
(3)(b) of Section 4 of this Act; and
(d) When a habitual truancy petition is filed with the court.
(4) By December 1, 2028, and then by December 1 of each year until December 1,
2031, the Kentucky Department of Education shall submit to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Education
and the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary an annual report that includes the
information under this subsection for the prior school term. The information
shall be reported by school district, and within each school district by gender,
race, and grade level and contain the following:
(a) The number of students reported to the county attorney as required under
subsection (3)(b) of Section 4 of this Act;
Page 9 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(b) The number of students against whom a complaint for habitual truancy is
filed with the court-designated worker, and among those children:
1. The number of unexcused absences per student prior to the filing of
the complaint for habitual truancy;
2. The number of students placed on diversion by the court-designated
worker and the number of unexcused absences per student after the
student is placed on diversion;
3. The number of students who successfully complete diversion and the
number of unexcused absences per student after diversion is
completed; and
4. The number of students whose case is referred to court on a habitual
truancy complaint, and the number of unexcused absences per student
after the complaint is referred to court; and
(c) The number of students who are withdrawn from a school district to be
homeschooled following the report to the county attorney under subsection
(3)(b) of Section 4 of this Act.
Section 6. KRS 610.030 is amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in KRS Chapters 600 to 645:
(1) If any person files a complaint alleging that a child, except a child alleged to be
neglected, abused, dependent, or mentally ill who is subject to the jurisdiction of the
court, may be within the purview of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, the court-designated
worker shall make a preliminary determination as to whether the complaint is
complete. In any case where the court-designated worker finds that the complaint is
incomplete, the court-designated worker shall return the complaint without delay to
the person or agency originating the complaint or having knowledge of the facts, or
to the appropriate law enforcement agency having investigative jurisdiction of the
offense, and request additional information in order to complete the complaint. The
Page 10 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
complainant shall promptly furnish the additional information requested;
(2) (a) Upon receipt of a complaint which appears to be complete and which alleges
that a child has committed a public offense, the court-designated worker shall
refer the complaint to the county attorney for review pursuant to KRS
635.010.
(b) If after review the county attorney elects to proceed, the court-designated
worker shall conduct a preliminary intake inquiry to recommend whether the
interests of the child or the public require that further action be taken or
whether, in the interest of justice, the complaint can be resolved informally
without the filing of a petition;
(3) Upon receipt of a truancy intervention precomplaint form required in subsection
(2) of Section 3 of this Act, the court-designated worker shall proceed in
accordance with Section 2 of this Act;
(4) Upon receipt of a complaint that appears to be complete and that alleges that the
child has committed a status offense, the court-designated worker shall conduct a
preliminary intake inquiry to determine whether the interests of the child or the
public require that further action be taken;
(5)[(4)] Prior to conducting a preliminary intake inquiry, the court-designated worker
shall notify the child and the child's parent, guardian, or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision of the child in writing:
(a) Of their opportunity to be present at the preliminary intake inquiry;
(b) That they may have counsel present during the preliminary intake inquiry
and[as well as] the formal conference[ thereafter];
(c) 1. That all information supplied by the child to a court-designated worker
during any process prior to the filing of the petition shall be deemed
confidential and shall not be subject to subpoena or to disclosure
without the written consent of the child.
Page 11 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
2. That information may be shared between treatment providers, the court-
designated worker, [and ]the family accountability, intervention, and
response team, and if applicable, the RISE team to enable the court-
designated worker to facilitate services and facilitate compliance with
the diversion agreement; and
(d) That the child has the right to deny the allegation and demand a formal court
hearing;
(6)[(5)] The preliminary intake inquiry shall include the administration of an
evidence-based screening tool and, if appropriate and available, a validated risk and
needs assessment, in order to identify whether the child and his or her family are in
need of services and the level of intervention needed;
(7)[(6)] (a) Upon the completion of the preliminary intake inquiry for a minor who
is alleged to be a status offender and has been reported to the county
attorney as required under subsection (3)(b) of Section 4 of this Act[under
KRS 630.020(3) and is alleged to have been absent without excuse for fifteen
(15) or more days during a school year], the court-designated worker shall, if
the county attorney elects not to refer the complaint for formal court action,
proceed[ refer the complaint to the county attorney. The county attorney shall
then refer the complaint:
1. For formal court action; or
2. To be handled] under subsection (9)[(8)] of this section.
(b) Upon the completion of the preliminary intake inquiry for all other
allegations, the court-designated worker may:
1. If the complaint alleges a status offense, and is filed against a student
from a school:
a. Without a SOAR Program, determine that no further action be
taken subject to review by the family accountability, intervention,
Page 12 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
and response team; or
b. With a SOAR Program, determine that no further action be
taken subject to review by the RISE team;
2. If the complaint alleges a public offense, refer the complaint to the
county attorney;
3. Refer a public offense complaint for informal adjustment; or
4. Based upon the results of the preliminary intake inquiry, other
information obtained, and a determination that the interests of the child
and the public would be better served, and with the written approval of
the county attorney for a public offense complaint, if necessary, conduct
a formal conference and enter into a diversion agreement;
(8)[(7)] Upon receiving written approval of the county attorney, if necessary, to divert
a public offense complaint, and prior to conducting a formal conference, the court-
designated worker shall advise in writing the complainant, the victim if any, and the
law enforcement agency having investigative jurisdiction of the offense:
(a) Of the recommendation and the reasons therefor and that the complainant,
victim, or law enforcement agency may submit within ten (10) days from
receipt of such notice a complaint to the county attorney for special review; or
(b) In the case of a misdemeanor diverted pursuant to KRS 635.010(4), of the fact
that the child was statutorily entitled to divert the case;
(9)[(8)] A formal conference shall include the child and his or her parent, guardian, or
other person exercising custodial control or supervision and may, upon agreement
of the court-designated worker, the child, and his or her parent, guardian, or
other person exercising custodial control or supervision, include other adult
support persons who are a significant presence in the child's life. The formal
conference shall be used to:
(a) Present information obtained at the preliminary intake inquiry; and
Page 13 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(b) Administer an evidence-based family screening tool to identify family
strengths, needs, and risks. Results from the family screening shall be used
to develop a family diversion agreement that shall not exceed twelve (12)
months in duration, and:
1. Shall include:
a. An individualized plan for the child and his or her parent,
guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision to address the needs of the child and the family;
b. A requirement[Develop a diversion agreement that shall:
a. i. Require] that the child regularly attend school or participate
in a specifically-identified educational program agreed upon by
the child, the court-designated worker, and the parent, guardian,
or other person exercising custodial control or supervision that
includes monitoring and reporting requirements to ensure
compliance;
c. A plan for monitoring the child and family's progress and
completion of the agreement, and for communication between
the family and the court-designated worker; and
d.[ii.] For a child against whom a complaint alleging habitual truancy
has been filed under subsection (3)(b) of Section 4 of this Act, a
requirement that:
i. The family be referred directly to the family accountability,
intervention, and response team; and[require that]
ii. If the child is absent from school without excuse for eight
(8)[four (4)] days during one (1) school term, as defined in
KRS 158.070, following the initial case review by the family
accountability, intervention, and response team, the family[
Page 14 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
during a diversion agreement, the child] shall immediately be
considered to have failed to complete the family diversion
agreement and subsection (10)(b)2.[(9)(b)3.] of this section
shall immediately apply; and
2.[b.] [Not exceed twelve (12) months in duration, and ]May include:
a.[i.] Referral of the child, parent, guardian, or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision of the child, or[and] the family
unit, if appropriate, to any or all of the following:
i. A public or private entity or person for the provision of
identified services to address needs identified through the
family screening[the complaint or assessed needs];
ii. [Referral of the child, and family if appropriate, to ]A
community service program within the limitations provided
under KRS 635.080(2);
iii. School-based resources such as mental health services,
family resource and youth service centers, or other
available services and programs;
iv. A restorative justice program; or
v. Any other available and appropriate program or service;
b.[iii.] Restitution, limited to the actual pecuniary loss suffered by
the victim, if the child has the means or ability to make restitution;
c.[iv.] Notification that the court-designated worker may apply
graduated sanctions to the child or parent, guardian, or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision for failure to
comply with the family diversion agreement; and
d. Any other provisions agreed upon by the court-designated
worker, the child, and the parent, guardian, or other person
Page 15 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
exercising custodial control or supervision[v. Any other
program or effort which reasonably benefits the community and
the child; and
vi. A plan for monitoring the child's progress and completion of the
agreement].
3.[2.] Prior to developing the family diversion agreement, the court-designated
worker [or court-designated specialist ]shall contact the school district
that the child attends to obtain background information from school
personnel regarding family background, education records, any services
previously provided, and any recommended trauma informed strategies.
4.[3.] Upon developing a family diversion agreement, the court-designated
worker[specialist] shall:
a. Make all details of the agreement accessible to all members of the
family, accountability, intervention, and response team through an
electronic platform provided by the Administrative Office of the
Courts; and
b. Electronically notify the director of pupil personnel at the school
district that the child attends that the child has entered into a
family diversion agreement, including the date of the agreement;
(10)[(9)] (a) If a child and his or her parent, guardian, or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision successfully completes the family[a]
diversion agreement, the underlying complaint against the child shall be
dismissed and further action related to that complaint shall be prohibited.
Upon completion of the family diversion agreement, the court-designated
worker shall electronically notify the director of pupil personnel at the
school district that the child attends, including the date the agreement was
successfully completed.
Page 16 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(b) 1. If a child fails to appear for a preliminary intake inquiry[,] or declines to
enter into a family diversion agreement[, or fails to complete a diversion
agreement], then:
a.[1.] For a public offense complaint, the matter shall be referred to the
county attorney for review and possible formal court action; and[,
if a petition is filed, the child may request that the court dismiss
the complaint based upon his or her substantial compliance with
the terms of diversion;]
b.[2]. For a status offense complaint filed against a student from a
school:
i. Without a SOAR Program,[ except as provided for in
subparagraph 3. of this paragraph,] the court-designated
worker shall refer the matter to the family accountability,
intervention, and response team for review and further
action;
ii. With a SOAR Program, the court-designated worker shall
refer the matter to the RISE team; and
2.[3.] a. If a child and his or her parent, guardian, or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision fail to complete a
family diversion agreement, then the family accountability,
intervention, and response team shall review the case to
determine the primary reason for the failure.
b. If the family accountability, intervention, and response team
determines that the primary reason for the failure is lack of
involvement by:
a. The parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision, then the family accountability,
Page 17 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
intervention, and response team shall refer the case to the
cabinet and shall share the results of the family-based
screening tool with the cabinet at the time of the referral.
The cabinet shall conduct an investigation of suspected
dependency, neglect, or abuse of the child as required by
KRS 605.130 and notify both the family accountability,
intervention, and response team and the county attorney of
its planned course of action and recommendation of how to
proceed; or
b. The child, then the case shall be referred to the county
attorney, and if a petition is filed, the child may request that
the court dismiss the complaint based upon his or her
substantial compliance with the terms of diversion[For a
status offense complaint alleging truancy for which the child
failed diversion in accordance with subsection (8)(b)1.a.ii. of
this section, the matter shall immediately be referred to the
county attorney for formal court action].
(c) 1. In a school without a SOAR Program, if the child and his or her
parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision enters into a family diversion agreement or is referred to the
family accountability, intervention, and response team for habitual
truancy and there is no action implemented by the family accountability,
intervention, and response team within thirty (30) days, the family
accountability, intervention, and response team shall report to the court
the reasons for inaction and shall provide a plan for action on the child's
case. The court shall review on the record any family diversion
agreement and any report, without the attendance or appearance of the
Page 18 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
child, or the child's parent, guardian, or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision at regular intervals at the court's
discretion to verify family accountability, intervention, and response
team member attendance, team accountability, and performance.
2. In a school with a SOAR Program, if the child enters into a family
diversion agreement or is referred to the RISE team for truancy at the
child's school and there is no action implemented by the RISE team
within thirty (30) days, the court-designated worker shall report to the
court the reasons for inaction and shall provide a plan for action on
the child's case. The court shall review on the record any family
diversion agreement and any report, without the attendance or
appearance of the child, at regular intervals at the court's discretion to
verify RISE team member attendance, team accountability, and
performance[(d) If a child fails to appear for a preliminary intake
inquiry or fails to complete a diversion agreement due to lack of parental
cooperation, the court-designated worker shall make a determination
that the child failed to complete the diversion due to lack of parent
cooperation];
(11)[(10)] If the county attorney refers a complaint for habitual truancy to the court,
the county attorney shall electronically notify the director of pupil personnel at
the school district that the child attends that the complaint has been filed,
including the date of the filing;
(12) If a complaint is referred to the court, the complaint and findings of the court-
designated worker's preliminary intake inquiry and any family assessment
conducted pursuant to subsection (9) of this section shall be submitted to the court
for the court to determine whether process should issue; and
[(11) If the court receives a report with a determination that the diversion is failed due to
Page 19 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
lack of parental cooperation, the court may order parental cooperation and refer the
case back to the court-designated worker. The child shall not be detained upon this
finding; and]
(13)[(12)] At any stage in the proceedings described in this section, the court or the
county attorney may review any decision of the court-designated worker. The court
upon its own motion or upon written request of the county attorney may refer any
complaint for a formal hearing.
Section 7. KRS 605.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A court-designated worker may:
(a) Receive complaints;
(b) Review complaints taken by peace officers;
(c) Investigate complaints except neglect, abuse, and dependency;
(d) Perform an initial screening for human trafficking as defined in KRS 529.010
for referral to the cabinet for investigation as a case of dependency, neglect, or
abuse;
(e) Dispose of complaints limited to a total of three (3) status or nonfelony public
offense complaints per child and, with written approval of the county
attorney, one (1) felony complaint that does not involve the commission of a
sexual offense or the use of a deadly weapon;
(f) Administer oaths;
(g) Issue summonses;
(h) Issue subpoenas;
(i) Make advisory dispositional recommendations and provide, within forty-eight
(48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, information concerning a
child who has chosen to waive the investigation pursuant to KRS 610.100;
(j) Perform any[such] duties [as ]required by KRS Chapter 645;
(k) Administer evidence-based screenings and assessments to identify the risk
Page 20 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
and needs of a child and his or her family;
(l) Enter into diversion agreements, including referral to programs or service
providers, providing case management and service coordination, assisting
with barriers to completion, and monitoring progress;
(m) Impose graduated sanctions, from least restrictive to most restrictive, in
response to violations of the terms of a diversion agreement;
(n) Gather information necessary to track and record outcomes of all diversion
agreement recommendations and final diversion disposition;
(o) Collaborate and cooperate with the family accountability, intervention, and
response team, director of pupil personnel as appropriate, and service
providers to ensure all appropriate interventions are utilized;
(p) Report annually to his or her local public school districts and to the
Administrative Office of the Courts an inventory of all programs and service
providers within the judicial district they serve;
(q) Request from the schools a student's education records pursuant to KRS
17.125; [and]
(r) Coordinate the SOAR Program; and
(s) Perform [such ]other functions related to activities of children as may be
authorized or directed by the court.
(2) Upon the filing of a petition which initiates a formal court action in the interest of
the child, the court-designated worker's involvement, with the exception of the
activities defined in subsection (1)(i) of this section, shall cease.
(3) When a child is to be tried as an adult, the court-designated worker need not make
dispositional recommendations.
Section 8. KRS 17.125 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following agencies are parts of Kentucky's juvenile justice system and shall,
subject to restrictions imposed by state or federal law, disclose and share with each
Page 21 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
other all information they maintain on a juvenile in a facility or program or informal
adjustment authorized by law:
(a) All sheriff's offices, police departments, and any other law enforcement
agency;
(b) All Commonwealth's attorneys and county attorneys;
(c) The Attorney General;
(d) All jails and juvenile detention facilities, public and private;
(e) All courts and clerks of courts;
(f) The Administrative Office of the Courts;
(g) All departments within the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;
(h) All departments within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; [and]
(i) All family accountability, intervention, and response teams; and
(j) All RISE teams as defined in Section 9 of this Act.
(2) Except as provided in this section, all information shared by agencies specified
above shall be subject to applicable confidentiality disclosure, redisclosure, and
access restrictions imposed by federal or state law.
(3) Once a:
(a) Complaint is filed with a court-designated worker alleging that a child has
committed a status offense or public offense; or[,]
(b) Child participates in a SOAR Program as defined in Section 9 of this Act
offered at the child's school;
all public or private elementary or secondary schools, vocational or business
schools, or institutions of higher education shall provide all records specifically
requested in writing, and pertaining to that child, to any of the agencies listed in
subsection (1) of this section. Pursuant to the authority granted to the
Commonwealth under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C.
sec. 1232g, when this section refers to the release of educational records, the
Page 22 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
purpose of the release shall be limited to providing the juvenile justice system with
the ability to effectively serve, prior to adjudication, the needs of the student whose
records are sought. The authorities to which the data are released shall certify that
any educational records obtained pursuant to this section shall only be released to
persons authorized by statute and shall not be released to any other person without
the written consent of the parent of the child. The request, certification, and a record
of the release shall be maintained in the student's file.
(4) Any request for records, the provision of records, the sharing of records, the
disclosure of records, or the redisclosure of records shall be done for official
purposes only, on a bona fide need to know basis, and only in connection with a
legitimate investigation, prosecution, treatment program, or educational program.
(5) Information and records relating to pending litigation in Circuit Court, District
Court, or a federal court and information and records relating to an ongoing
investigation are not subject to disclosure or sharing under this section.
(6) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a record relating to a minor or by sharing or
attempting to share a record relating to a minor with an unauthorized person is a
violation of this section.
Section 9. KRS 600.020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS Chapters 600 to 645, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Abused or neglected child" means a child whose health or welfare is harmed or
threatened with harm when:
(a) His or her parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or special trust,
as defined in KRS 532.045, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child:
1. Inflicts or allows to be inflicted upon the child physical or emotional
injury as defined in this section by other than accidental means;
2. Creates or allows to be created a risk of physical or emotional injury as
Page 23 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
defined in this section to the child by other than accidental means;
3. Engages in a pattern of conduct that renders the parent incapable of
caring for the immediate and ongoing needs of the child, including but
not limited to parental incapacity due to a substance use disorder as
defined in KRS 222.005;
4. Continuously or repeatedly fails or refuses to provide essential parental
care and protection for the child, considering the age of the child;
5. Commits or allows to be committed an act of sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, or prostitution upon the child;
6. Creates or allows to be created a risk that an act of sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, or prostitution will be committed upon the child;
7. Abandons or exploits the child;
8. Does not provide the child with adequate care, supervision, food,
clothing, shelter, and education or medical care necessary for the child's
well-being when financially able to do so or offered financial or other
means to do so. A parent or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child legitimately practicing the person's religious
beliefs shall not be considered a negligent parent solely because of
failure to provide specified medical treatment for a child for that reason
alone. This exception shall not preclude a court from ordering necessary
medical services for a child;
9. Fails to make sufficient progress toward identified goals as set forth in
the court-approved case plan to allow for the safe return of the child to
the parent that results in the child remaining committed to the cabinet
and remaining in foster care for fifteen (15) cumulative months out of
forty-eight (48) months; or
10. Commits or allows female genital mutilation as defined in KRS 508.125
Page 24 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
to be committed; or
(b) A person twenty-one (21) years of age or older commits or allows to be
committed an act of sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or prostitution upon a
child less than sixteen (16) years of age;
(2) "Age or developmentally appropriate" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. sec.
675(11);
(3) "Aggravated circumstances" means the existence of one (1) or more of the
following conditions:
(a) The parent has not attempted or has not had contact with the child for a period
of not less than ninety (90) days;
(b) The parent is incarcerated and will be unavailable to care for the child for a
period of at least one (1) year from the date of the child's entry into foster care
and there is no appropriate relative placement available during this period of
time;
(c) The parent has sexually abused the child and has refused available treatment;
(d) The parent has been found by the cabinet to have engaged in abuse of the
child that required removal from the parent's home two (2) or more times in
the past two (2) years; or
(e) The parent has caused the child serious physical injury;
(4) "Beyond the control of parents" means a child who has repeatedly failed to follow
the reasonable directives of his or her parents, legal guardian, or person exercising
custodial control or supervision other than a state agency, which behavior results in
danger to the child or others, and which behavior does not constitute behavior that
would warrant the filing of a petition under KRS Chapter 645;
(5) "Beyond the control of school" means any child who has been found by the court to
have repeatedly violated the lawful regulations for the government of the school as
provided in KRS 158.150, and as documented in writing by the school as a part of
Page 25 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
the school's petition or as an attachment to the school's petition. The petition or
attachment shall describe the student's behavior and all intervention strategies
attempted by the school;
(6) "Boarding home" means a privately owned and operated home for the boarding and
lodging of individuals which is approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice or
the cabinet for the placement of children committed to the department or the
cabinet;
(7) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(8) "Certified juvenile facility staff" means individuals who meet the qualifications of,
and who have completed a course of education and training in juvenile detention
developed and approved by, the Department of Juvenile Justice after consultation
with other appropriate state agencies;
(9) "Child" means any person who has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday,
unless otherwise provided;
(10) "Child-caring facility" means any facility or group home other than a state facility,
Department of Juvenile Justice contract facility or group home, or one certified by
an appropriate agency as operated primarily for educational or medical purposes,
providing residential care on a twenty-four (24) hour basis to children not related by
blood, adoption, or marriage to the person maintaining the facility;
(11) "Child-placing agency" means any agency, other than a state agency, which
supervises the placement of children in foster family homes or child-caring
facilities or which places children for adoption;
(12) "Clinical treatment facility" means a facility with more than eight (8) beds
designated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet for the treatment of
mentally ill children. The treatment program of such facilities shall be supervised
by a qualified mental health professional;
(13) "Commitment" means an order of the court which places a child under the custodial
Page 26 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
control or supervision of the cabinet[ for Health and Family Services], Department
of Juvenile Justice, or another facility or agency until the child attains the age of
eighteen (18) unless otherwise provided by law;
(14) "Community-based facility" means any nonsecure, homelike facility licensed,
operated, or permitted to operate by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the
cabinet, which is located within a reasonable proximity of the child's family and
home community, which affords the child the opportunity, if a Kentucky resident,
to continue family and community contact;
(15) "Complaint" means a verified statement setting forth allegations in regard to the
child which contain sufficient facts for the formulation of a subsequent petition;
(16) "Court" means the juvenile session of District Court unless a statute specifies the
adult session of District Court or the Circuit Court;
(17) "Court-designated worker" means that organization or individual delegated by the
Administrative Office of the Courts for the purposes of placing children in
alternative placements prior to arraignment, conducting preliminary investigations,
and formulating, entering into, and supervising diversion agreements and
performing such other functions as authorized by law or court order;
(18) "Deadly weapon" has the same meaning as [it does ]in KRS 500.080;
(19) "Department" means the Department for Community Based Services;
(20) "Dependent child" means any child, other than an abused or neglected child, who is
under improper care, custody, control, or guardianship that is not due to an
intentional act of the parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child;
(21) "Detention" means the safe and temporary custody of a juvenile who is accused of
conduct subject to the jurisdiction of the court who requires a restricted or closely
supervised environment for his or her own or the community's protection;
(22) "Detention hearing" means a hearing held by a judge or trial commissioner within
Page 27 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the start of any
period of detention prior to adjudication;
(23) "Diversion agreement" means a mechanism designed to hold a child accountable
for his or her behavior and, if appropriate, securing services to serve the best
interest of the child and to provide redress for that behavior without court action
and without the creation of a formal court record;
(24) "Eligible youth" means a person who:
(a) Is or has been committed to the cabinet as dependent, neglected, or abused;
(b) Is eighteen (18) years of age to nineteen (19) years of age; and
(c) Is requesting to extend or reinstate his or her commitment to the cabinet in
order to participate in state or federal educational programs or to establish
independent living arrangements;
(25) "Emergency shelter" is a group home, private residence, foster home, or similar
homelike facility which provides temporary or emergency care of children and
adequate staff and services consistent with the needs of each child;
(26) "Emotional injury" means an injury to the mental or psychological capacity or
emotional stability of a child as evidenced by a substantial and observable
impairment in the child's ability to function within a normal range of performance
and behavior with due regard to his or her age, development, culture, and
environment as testified to by a qualified mental health professional;
(27) "Evidence-based practices" means policies, procedures, programs, and practices
proven by scientific research to reliably produce reductions in recidivism;
(28) "Fictive kin" means an individual who is not related by birth, adoption, or marriage
to a child, but who has an emotionally significant relationship with the child, or an
emotionally significant relationship with a biological parent, siblings, or half-
siblings of the child in the case of a child from birth to twelve (12) months of age,
prior to placement;
Page 28 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(29) "Firearm" has[shall have] the same meaning as in KRS 237.060[ and 527.010];
(30) "Foster family home" means a private home in which children are placed for foster
family care under supervision of the cabinet or a licensed child-placing agency;
(31) "Graduated sanction" means any of a continuum of accountability measures,
programs, and sanctions, ranging from less restrictive to more restrictive in nature,
that may include but are not limited to:
(a) Electronic monitoring;
(b) Drug and alcohol screening, testing, or monitoring;
(c) Day or evening reporting centers;
(d) Reporting requirements;
(e) Community service; and
(f) Rehabilitative interventions such as family counseling, substance abuse
treatment, restorative justice programs, and behavioral or mental health
treatment;
(32) "Habitual runaway" means any child who has been found by the court to have been
absent from his or her place of lawful residence without the permission of his or her
custodian for at least three (3) days during a one (1) year period;
(33) "Habitual truant" means any child who is alleged to be or has been found by the
court to be[have been reported as] a habitual truant as defined in KRS
159.150(3)[(1) two (2) or more times during a one (1) year period];
(34) "Hospital" means, except for purposes of KRS Chapter 645, a licensed private or
public facility, health care facility, or part thereof, which is approved by the cabinet
to treat children;
(35) "Independent living" means those activities necessary to assist a committed child to
establish independent living arrangements;
(36) "Informal adjustment" means an agreement reached among the parties, with
consultation, but not the consent, of the victim of the crime or other persons
Page 29 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
specified in KRS 610.070 if the victim chooses not to or is unable to participate,
after a petition has been filed, which is approved by the court, that the best interest
of the child would be served without formal adjudication and disposition;
(37) "Intentionally" means, with respect to a result or to conduct described by a statute
which defines an offense, that the actor's conscious objective is to cause that result
or to engage in that conduct;
(38) "Least restrictive alternative" means, except for purposes of KRS Chapter 645, that
the program developed on the child's behalf is:
(a) No more harsh, hazardous, or intrusive than necessary;[ or]
(b) Involves no restrictions on physical movements nor requirements for
residential care except as reasonably necessary for the protection of the child
from physical injury[;] or protection of the community;[,] and[ is]
(c) Conducted at the suitable available facility closest to the child's place of
residence to allow for appropriate family engagement;
(39) "Motor vehicle offense" means any violation of the nonfelony provisions of KRS
Chapters 186, 189, or 189A, KRS 177.300, 304.39-110, or 304.39-117;
(40) "Near fatality" means an injury that, as certified by a physician, places a child in
serious or critical condition;
(41) "Needs of the child" means necessary food, clothing, health, shelter, and education;
(42) "Nonoffender" means a child alleged to be dependent, neglected, or abused and
who has not been otherwise charged with a status or public offense;
(43) "Nonsecure facility" means a facility which provides its residents access to the
surrounding community and which does not rely primarily on the use of physically
restricting construction and hardware to restrict freedom;
(44) "Nonsecure setting" means a nonsecure facility or a residential home, including a
child's own home, where a child may be temporarily placed pending further court
action. Children before the court in a county that is served by a state operated
Page 30 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
secure detention facility, who are in the detention custody of the Department of
Juvenile Justice, and who are placed in a nonsecure alternative by the Department
of Juvenile Justice, shall be supervised by the Department of Juvenile Justice;
(45) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement other than in the home of a parent,
relative, or guardian, in a boarding home, clinical treatment facility, community-
based facility, detention facility, emergency shelter, fictive kin home, foster family
home, hospital, nonsecure facility, physically secure facility, residential treatment
facility, or youth alternative center;
(46) "Parent" means the biological or adoptive mother or father of a child;
(47) "Person exercising custodial control or supervision" means a person or agency that
has assumed the role and responsibility of a parent or guardian for the child, but that
does not necessarily have legal custody of the child;
(48) "Petition" means a verified statement[,] setting forth allegations in regard to the
child[,] which initiates formal court involvement in the child's case;
(49) "Physical injury" means substantial physical pain or any impairment of physical
condition;
(50) "Physically secure facility" means a facility that relies primarily on the use of
construction and hardware such as locks, bars, and fences to restrict freedom;
(51) "Public offense action" means an action, excluding contempt, brought in the interest
of a child who is accused of committing an offense under KRS Chapter 527 or a
public offense which, if committed by an adult, would be a crime, whether the same
is a felony, misdemeanor, or violation, other than an action alleging that a child
sixteen (16) years of age or older has committed a motor vehicle offense;
(52) "Qualified mental health professional" means:
(a) A physician licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the performance of official duties;
Page 31 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(b) A psychiatrist licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the practice of official duties, and who is certified or eligible to
apply for certification by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology,
Inc.;
(c) A psychologist with the health service provider designation, a psychological
practitioner, a certified psychologist, or a psychological associate licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319;
(d) A licensed registered nurse with:
1. A master's degree in psychiatric nursing from an accredited institution
and two (2) years of clinical experience with mentally ill persons;[,] or[
a licensed registered nurse with]
2. A bachelor's degree in nursing from an accredited institution who:
a. Is certified as a psychiatric and mental health nurse by the
American Nurses Association;[ and who]
b. Has three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric nursing; and[ who]
c. Is currently employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing
mental health services, or a regional comprehensive care center;
(e) A licensed clinical social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.100, or a certified social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.080 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric social work and currently employed by a hospital or forensic
psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit of a
general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing mental
Page 32 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
health services, or a regional comprehensive care center;
(f) A marriage and family therapist licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.300 to 335.399 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical
experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a
hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a
psychiatric unit of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in
providing mental health services, or a regional comprehensive care center;
(g) A professional counselor credentialed under the provisions of KRS 335.500 to
335.599 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a hospital or
forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit of a
general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing mental
health services, or a regional comprehensive care center; or
(h) A physician assistant licensed under KRS 311.840 to 311.862, who meets one
(1) of the following requirements:
1. Provides documentation that he or she has completed a psychiatric
residency program for physician assistants;
2. Has completed at least one thousand (1,000) hours of clinical experience
under a supervising physician, as defined by KRS 311.840, who is a
psychiatrist and is certified or eligible for certification by the American
Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
3. Holds a master's degree from a physician assistant program accredited
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant or its predecessor or successor agencies, is
practicing under a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840,
and:
a. Has two (2) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
Page 33 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least two (2) years; or
4. Holds a bachelor's degree, possesses a current physician assistant
certificate issued by the board prior to July 15, 2002, is practicing under
a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840, and:
a. Has three (3) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least three (3) years;
(53) "Reasonable and prudent parent standard" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C.
sec. 675(10);
(54) "Residential treatment facility" means a facility or group home with more than eight
(8) beds designated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet for the
treatment of children;
(55) "Responsive Interventions to Support and Empower team" or "RISE team"
means the interdisciplinary team established by a school participating in the
SOAR Program under Section 1 of this Act;
(56) "Retain in custody" means, after a child has been taken into custody, the continued
Page 34 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
holding of the child by a peace officer for a period of time not to exceed twelve (12)
hours when authorized by the court or the court-designated worker for the purpose
of making preliminary inquiries;
(57)[(56)] "Risk and needs assessment" means an actuarial tool scientifically proven to
identify specific factors and needs that are related to delinquent and noncriminal
misconduct;
(58)[(57)] "Safety plan" means a written agreement developed by the cabinet and agreed
to by a family that clearly describes the protective services that the cabinet will
provide the family in order to manage risks to a child's safety;
(59)[(58)] "School personnel" means those certified persons under the supervision of the
local public or private education agency;
(60)[(59)] "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services;
(61)[(60)] "Secure juvenile detention facility" means any physically secure facility used
for the secure detention of children other than any facility in which adult prisoners
are confined;
(62)[(61)] "Serious physical injury" means physical injury which creates a substantial
risk of death or which causes serious and prolonged disfigurement, prolonged
impairment of health, or prolonged loss or impairment of the function of any bodily
member or organ;
(63)[(62)] "Sexual abuse" includes but is not [necessarily ]limited to any contacts or
interactions in which the parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or
special trust, as those terms are defined in KRS 532.045, or other person having
custodial control or supervision of the child or responsibility for his or her welfare,
uses or allows, permits, or encourages the use of the child for the purposes of the
sexual stimulation of the perpetrator or another person;
(64)[(63)] "Sexual exploitation" includes but is not limited to a situation in which a
Page 35 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or special trust, as those terms
are defined in KRS 532.045, or other person having custodial control or supervision
of a child or responsible for his or her welfare, allows, permits, or encourages the
child to engage in an act which constitutes prostitution under Kentucky law; or a
parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or special trust, as those terms
are defined in KRS 532.045, or other person having custodial control or supervision
of a child or responsible for his or her welfare, allows, permits, or encourages the
child to engage in an act of obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, or
depicting of a child as provided[ for] under Kentucky law;
(65)[(64)] "Social service worker" means any employee of the cabinet or any private
agency designated as such by the secretary of the cabinet or a social worker
employed by a county or city who has been approved by the cabinet to provide,
under its supervision, services to families and children;
(66)[(65)] "Staff secure facility for residential treatment" means any setting which
assures that all entrances and exits are under the exclusive control of the facility
staff, and in which a child may reside for the purpose of receiving treatment;
(67)[(66)] "Statewide reporting system" means a system for making and compiling
reports of child dependency, neglect, and abuse in Kentucky made via telephone
call or in writing by a member of the public;
(68)[(67)] (a) "Status offense action" is any action brought in the interest of a child
who is accused of committing acts, which if committed by an adult, would not
be a crime. Such behavior shall not be considered criminal or delinquent and
such children shall be termed status offenders. Status offenses shall include:
1. Beyond the control of school or beyond the control of parents;
2. Habitual runaway;
3. Habitual truant; and
4. Alcohol offenses as provided in KRS 244.085.
Page 36 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(b) Status offenses shall not include violations of state or local ordinances which
may apply to children such as a violation of curfew;
(69) "Supporting Opportunities for Accountability and Restoration Program" or
"SOAR Program" means the pilot program established under Section 1 of this
Act;
(70)[(68)] "Take into custody" means the procedure by which a peace officer or other
authorized person initially assumes custody of a child. A child may be taken into
custody for a period of time not to exceed two (2) hours;
(71)[(69)] "Transitional living support" means all benefits to which an eligible youth is
entitled upon being granted extended or reinstated commitment to the cabinet by the
court;
(72)[(70)] "Transition plan" means a plan that is personalized at the direction of the
youth that:
(a) Includes specific options on housing, health insurance, education, local
opportunities for mentors and continuing support services, and workforce
supports and employment services; and
(b) Is as detailed as the youth may elect;
(73)[(71)] "Valid court order" means a court order issued by a judge to a child alleged or
found to be a status offender:
(a) Who was brought before the court and made subject to the order;
(b) Whose future conduct was regulated by the order;
(c) Who was given written and verbal warning of the consequences of the
violation of the order at the time the order was issued and whose attorney or
parent or legal guardian was also provided with a written notice of the
consequences of violation of the order, which notification is reflected in the
record of the court proceedings; and
(d) Who received, before the issuance of the order, the full due process rights
Page 37 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States;
(74)[(72)] "Violation" means any offense, other than a traffic infraction, for which a
sentence of a fine only can be imposed;
(75)[(73)] "Youth alternative center" means a nonsecure facility, approved by the
Department of Juvenile Justice, for the detention of juveniles, both prior to
adjudication and after adjudication, which meets the criteria specified in KRS
15A.320; and
(76)[(74)] "Youthful offender" means any person regardless of age, transferred to Circuit
Court under the provisions of KRS Chapter 635 or 640 and who is subsequently
convicted in Circuit Court.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 630 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A child who is alleged to be a status offender, adjudicated as a status offender, or
a status offender alleged or found to have violated a valid court order may be
detained as follows:
(a) A child who is under sixteen (16) years old shall not be detained in a secure
juvenile detention facility but may be detained in a nonsecure setting
approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice; and
(b) A child who is sixteen (16) years of age or older may be detained in a
nonsecure setting approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice or a
secure juvenile detention facility.
(2) (a) Unless a shorter time period is established in this chapter or KRS Chapter
610, any child who may be detained in a secure juvenile detention facility
shall not be detained for longer than seven (7) days unless a court makes
written findings that further detention of the child is necessary for the
protection of the child or the community.
(b) In no event shall the period of detention under paragraph (a) of this
Page 38 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
subsection exceed thirty (30) days.
Section 11. KRS 610.265 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any child who is alleged to be a status offender or who is accused of being in
contempt of court on an underlying finding that the child is a status offender
may be detained in accordance with Section 10 of this Act[in a nonsecure
facility or a secure juvenile detention facility] for a period of time not to
exceed twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending a
detention hearing.
(b) Any child who is accused of committing a public offense or of being in
contempt of court on an underlying public offense may be detained in a secure
juvenile detention facility or a nonsecure setting approved by the Department
of Juvenile Justice for a period of time not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours,
exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending a detention hearing.
(2) [Beginning July 1, 2024, ]Any child accused of committing a public offense that
would be considered a violent felony offense as defined in KRS 532.200 shall be
detained in a secure juvenile detention facility for a period of time not to exceed
forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending a detention
hearing, unless the detention hearing can be held within the time allotted to peace
officers to retain custody of the child pursuant to KRS 610.200 or 610.220. This
subsection shall not apply to any child ten (10) years of age or younger.
(3) (a) Any child detained pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be assessed
by a mental health professional, whose communications with the child shall
be confidential in conformity with the Kentucky Rules of Evidence, to
determine if the child exhibits behavior that indicates the child could benefit
from cognitive behavioral therapy, other evidence-based behavioral health
programs, substance use disorder treatment, or treatment in a psychiatric
facility for serious mental illness.
Page 39 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(b) Any treatment recommended under this subsection shall be provided by the
Department of Juvenile Justice and may be provided pursuant to a contract
between the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet and a behavioral health
services organization.
(c) If the child is released upon a detention hearing, a court may order the child to
complete any recommended treatment. The Department of Juvenile Justice
shall refer the child to an existing contractor or to other resources for the
treatment.
(4) Any child detained pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be permitted
visitation from individuals representing organizations including nonprofit
organizations, faith-based organizations, or community organizations, to connect
them with, expose them to, or minister to them through programs including but not
limited to trades, arts, sports, mentoring, counseling, support programs, or
community-based programs. These organizations may offer transition services to
any child who is released from detention.
(5) Within the period of detention described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
exclusive of weekends and holidays, a detention hearing shall be held by the judge
or trial commissioner of the court for the purpose of determining whether the child
shall be further detained. At the hearing held pursuant to this subsection, the court
shall consider the nature of the offense, the child's background and history, and
other information relevant to the child's conduct or condition.
(6) If the court orders a child detained further, that detention shall be served as follows:
(a) If the child is charged with a capital offense, Class A felony, or Class B
felony, detention shall occur in a secure juvenile detention facility pending the
child's next court appearance subject to the court's review of the detention
order prior to that court appearance;
(b) Except as provided in KRS 630.080(2), if it is alleged that the child is a status
Page 40 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
offender, the child may be detained in accordance with Section 10 of this
Act[a secure juvenile detention facility for a period not to exceed twenty-four
(24) hours after which detention shall occur in a nonsecure setting approved
by the Department of Juvenile Justice] pending the child's next court
appearance subject to the court's review of the detention order prior to the
next court appearance;
(c) If a status offender or a child alleged to be a status offender is charged with
violating a valid court order, the child may be detained in accordance with
Section 10 of this Act[a secure juvenile detention facility, or in a nonsecure
setting approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice,] for a period not to
exceed forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending
the child's next court appearance;
(d) Prior to ordering a status offender or alleged status offender who is subject to
a valid court order [securely ]detained in accordance with Section 10 of this
Act because the child violated the valid court order, the court shall:
1. Affirm that the requirements for a valid court order were met at the time
the original order was issued;
2. Make a determination during the adjudicatory hearing that the child
violated the valid court order; and
3. Within forty-eight (48) hours after the adjudicatory hearing on the
violation of a valid court order by the child, exclusive of weekends and
holidays, receive and review a written report prepared by an appropriate
public agency that reviews the behavior of the child and the
circumstances under which the child was brought before the court,
determines the reasons for the child's behavior, and determines whether
all dispositions other than [secure ]detention have been exhausted or are
inappropriate. If a prior written report is included in the child's file, that
Page 41 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
report shall not be used to satisfy this requirement. The child may be
[securely ]detained in accordance with Section 10 of this Act for a
period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends and
holidays, pending receipt and review of the report by the court. The
hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS 610.060. The
findings required by this subsection shall be included in any order issued
by the court which results in the secure or nonsecure detention of a
status offender; and
(e) If the child is charged with a public offense[,] or contempt on a public
offense, and the county in which the case is before the court is served by a
state -operated secure detention facility under the statewide detention plan, the
child shall be referred to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a security
assessment and placement in an approved detention facility or program
pending the child's next court appearance.
(7) If, at the hearing conducted under subsection (5) of this section, the court conducts
an adjudicatory hearing on the merits of a violation of a valid court order, that
hearing shall conform to the requirements of KRS 630.080.
(8) If the detention hearing is not held as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the
child shall be released as provided in KRS 610.290.
(9) If the child is not released, the court-designated worker shall notify the parent,
person exercising custodial control or supervision, a relative, guardian, or other
responsible adult, and the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as
appropriate.
Section 12. KRS 610.990 is amended to read as follows:
Any person who intentionally violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty
of a Class B misdemeanor[, except that an intentional violation of an order issued under
KRS 610.030(11) shall be referred to the county attorney for prosecution under KRS
Page 42 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
530.070(1)(c) if the case relates to truancy].
Section 13. KRS 630.010 is amended to read as follows:
In addition to those purposes set forth in KRS 600.010, this chapter shall be interpreted
and construed to effectuate the following purposes regarding status offenders:
(1) The Commonwealth's courts shall utilize a separate and distinct set of guidelines for
status offenders which reflect their individual needs;
(2) It shall be declared to be the policy of this Commonwealth that all its efforts and
resources be directed at involving the child and the family in remedying the
problem for which they have been referred;
(3) A status offender[Status offenders shall not be detained in secure juvenile detention
facilities or juvenile holding facilities after the initial detention hearing unless the
child is] accused of[,] or adjudicated for the violation of[has an adjudication that
the child has violated] a valid court order[, in which case the child] may be securely
detained in accordance with Section 10 of this Act for up to forty-eight (48) hours,
exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending receipt of the written report required
under KRS 630.080(4). Any period of secure detention prior to the detention
hearing shall not exceed twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends and
holidays;
(4) Status offenders accused of violating a valid court order shall not be securely
detained in intermittent holding facilities; and
(5) Status offenders accused of or found guilty of violating a valid court order shall not
be converted into public offenders by virtue of this conduct.
Section 14. KRS 630.040 is amended to read as follows:
Any person taking a child into custody, with all reasonable speed, shall in this sequence:
(1) Deliver the child suffering from a physical condition or illness which requires
prompt medical treatment to a medical facility or physician. Children suspected of
having a mental or emotional illness shall be evaluated in accordance with the
Page 43 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
provisions of KRS Chapter 645;
(2) Contact a court designated worker who shall have the responsibility for determining
appropriate placement pursuant to KRS 610.200(5);
(3) If the court designated worker determines that the placements designated in KRS
610.200(5) and subsection (1) of this section have been exhausted or are not
appropriate, a child may be delivered to a secure juvenile detention facility, a
juvenile holding facility, or a nonsecure setting approved by the Department of
Juvenile Justice, in accordance with Section 10 of this Act, pending the detention
hearing;
(4) When the child has not been released to his or her parents or person exercising
custodial control or supervision, the person taking the child into custody shall make
a reasonable effort promptly to give oral notice to the parent or person exercising
custodial control or supervision of the child;
(5) In all instances the peace officer taking a child into custody shall provide a written
statement to the court designated worker of the reasons for taking the child into
custody;
(6) If the child is placed in an emergency shelter or medical facility, during the
adjudication and disposition of his case, the court may order his or her parents to be
responsible for the expense of his care; and
(7) The peace officer taking the child into custody shall within three (3) hours of taking
a child into custody file a complaint with the court, stating the basis for taking the
child into custody and the reason why the child was not released to the parent or
other adult exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, relative or other
responsible adult, a court designated agency, an emergency shelter or medical
facility. Pending further disposition of the case, the court or the court designated
worker may release the child to the custody of any responsible adult who can
provide adequate care and supervision.
Page 44 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
Section 15. KRS 630.050 is amended to read as follows:
Before commencing any judicial proceedings on any complaint alleging the commission
of a status offense, except as permitted under KRS 610.030(7)[(6)], the party or parties
seeking such court action shall meet for a conference with a court-designated worker for
the express purpose of determining whether or not:
(1) To refer the matter to the court by assisting in the filing of a petition under KRS
610.020;
(2) To refer the child and his family to a public or private social service agency. The
court-designated worker shall make reasonable efforts to refer the child and his
family to an agency before referring the matter to court; or
(3) To enter into a diversionary agreement.
Section 16. KRS 630.070 is amended to read as follows:
A[No] status offender shall not be placed in a secure juvenile detention facility or
juvenile holding facility as a means or form of punishment except in accordance with
Section 10 of this Act, following a finding that the status offender has violated a valid
court order.
Section 17. KRS 630.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In order for the court to detain a child after the detention hearing, the
Commonwealth shall establish probable cause at the detention hearing that the
child is a status offender and that further detention of the child is necessary for
the protection of the child or the community.
(b) If the Commonwealth fails to establish probable cause that the child is a status
offender, the complaint shall be dismissed and the child shall be released.
(c) If the Commonwealth establishes probable cause that the child is a status
offender, but that further detention of the child is not necessary for the
protection of the child or the community, the child shall be released to the
parent or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child.
Page 45 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
(d) If grounds are established that the child is a status offender, and that further
detention is necessary, the child may be placed in a nonsecure setting
approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice;
(2) Notwithstanding Section 10 of this Act, a status offender may be securely detained
if the cabinet has initiated or intends to initiate transfer of the youth by competent
document under the provisions of the interstate compact pursuant to KRS Chapter
615;
(3) The appropriate public agency shall:
(a) Within twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of
receiving notification, as provided in KRS 15A.305(3), that a status offender
or alleged status offender has been detained on the allegation that the child
has violated a valid court order, meet with and interview the child; and
(b) Within forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends[weekend] and holidays,
of the detention hearing required under KRS 610.265, prepare and deliver to
the court the completed written report required by subsection (4) of this
section and KRS 610.265 if the child remains in detention after the detention
hearing, and prior to the disposition hearing if the child has not been detained;
and
(4) (a) A status offender or alleged status offender who is subject to a valid court
order may be [securely ]detained in accordance with Section 10 of this Act
upon a finding that the child violated the valid court order if the court does the
following prior to ordering that detention:
1.[(a)] Affirms that the requirements for a valid court order were met at
the time the original order was issued;
2.[(b)] Makes a determination during the adjudicatory hearing that the
child violated the valid court order; and
3.[(c)] a. Within forty-eight (48) hours after the adjudicatory hearing
Page 46 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 144
on the violation of a valid court order by the child, exclusive of
weekends and holidays, the court:
i. Receives and reviews a written report prepared by an
appropriate public agency that reviews the behavior of the
child and the circumstances under which the child was
brought before the court,
ii. Determines the reasons for the child's behavior;[,] and
iii. Determines whether all dispositions other than [secure
]detention in accordance with Section 10 of this Act have
been exhausted or are inappropriate.
b. If a prior written report is included in the child's file, that report
shall not be used to satisfy this requirement.
(b) The child may be [securely ]detained in accordance with Section 10 of this
Act for a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends
and holidays, pending receipt and review of the report by the court under
paragraph (a)3. of this subsection.
(c) The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS
610.060. The findings required by this subsection shall be included in any
order issued by the court which results in the [secure or nonsecure ]detention
of a status offender.
Section 18. The following KRS section is repealed:
630.100 Detention of adjudicated status offender.
Page 47 of 47
XXXX 2/5/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed